District of Columbia statutes.
42-1709

Savings clause.

(a)

The repeal of any provision of §§ 42-1721 to 42-1738 [repealed], or any rule issued pursuant to this subchapter, shall not affect any act done, or any right accruing or accrued on any liability arising, or any suit or proceeding had or commenced in any civil cause under §§ 42-1721 to 42-1738 [repealed] before repeal, but all rights and liabilities under §§ 42-1721 to 42-1738 [repealed] shall continue and may be enforced in the same manner and to the same extent as if this subchapter had not been enacted.

(b)

Any violation of any provision of §§ 42-1721 to 42-1738 [repealed] or any liability arising under the provision, shall, if the violation occurred prior to repeal, be prosecuted and punished in the same manner and with the same effect as if this subchapter had not been enacted.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 33, 30 DCR 390
1981 Ed., § 45-1951.